Delaware, session 153, HB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 46, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 46. Delaware Educator Apprenticeship Program Â§ 4601. Definitions. As used in this chapter: (1) âApplicantâ means any school district, public school, or institute of higher education acting independently, or as part of a consortium with other school districts or public schools. (2) âParaprofessionalâ means a public school employee covered by Â§ 1324 of this title. The term âparaprofessionalâ includes a paraeducator or teacher aide. (2) (3) âPublic schoolâ means any school that is part of a reorganized school district, a vocational school, or a charter school established under Chapter 5 of this title. Â§ 4602. Establishment; statement of purpose. (a) The Department of Education, in partnership with applicants and the Department of Labor, shall create and administer the Delaware Educator Apprenticeship Program. School Program, which includes the following apprenticeship programs: (1) Teacher apprenticeships. (2) Paraprofessional registered occupation. (3) Registered youth apprenticeship. (b) Under the teacher apprenticeship program, school districts and charter schools will must place participants into positions in schools, alongside teacher mentors, while the participants complete training and education programs to become a credentialed Delaware educator. (c) The paraprofessional registered occupation must be registered under the K-12 teacher apprenticeship program designed for aspiring paraprofessionals to obtain an associateâs degree. This program must provide a smooth transition to teacher residency and teacher apprenticeship programs. (d) The registered youth apprenticeship must align with state and federal pre-apprenticeship standards, in partnership with the Department of Labor. It is structured to meet the entry requirements of registered teacher apprenticeship programs. This program must offer high school students the opportunity to accumulate hours toward their educator certification and to earn a minimum number of higher education credits to ensure meaningful progress toward their post-secondary education and career goals. (b) The purpose of this program is to support educator recruitment and increase the pipeline of qualified educators for our public schools by utilizing an apprenticeship model for training. This program will complement additional strategies underway through the Stateâs Grow Your Own Educator Program and teacher residency programs by providing a low-cost pathway to become a certified educator to address the educator shortage in Delaware. (c) (e) In selecting applicants for this program, the Department of Education shall consider all of the following: (1) An applicantâs commitment to Grow your Own Educator programs, including well-developed teacher academies and pathways that start in middle school and extend through high school. (2) An applicantâs established and proposed partnerships with other institutions and programs. (3) An applicantâs commitment to diversifying the workforce and supporting underrepresented populations. (4) An applicantâs commitment to providing on-the-job training, competitive wages and benefits, and long-term hiring opportunities to program participants. (5) An applicantâs commitment to new teacher mentoring programs, including mentor teacher training and support programs. (6) An applicantâs commitment to expanding teacher pathways in middle and high school through registered youth apprenticeship programs and paraprofessional registered occupation programs. (7) An applicantâs support for paraprofessional registered occupation programs that smoothly transition into teacher certification programs. (d) (f) The Department of Education shall explore and may include the following elements in the design of the Delaware Educator Apprenticeship Program: (1) Technical assistance services to be provided by programs with expertise in the apprenticeship model. (2) National credentials that may be available for teacher apprentice programs. (3) Tax credits available to program participants. (4) Federal and state funding available for training and educating teacher mentors and apprentices. (5) Additional incentives for recruiting program participants. Section 2. A pilot program for the paraprofessional registered occupation program shall be created between at least 1 institute of higher education and at least 1 district or charter school for the 2025-2026 academic school year. The program shall be expanded based on interest and funding in the 2026-2027 academic year and shall continue as funding is available. The Department of Education shall work closely with the Delaware Department of Labor to ensure that the registered youth apprenticeship programs and paraprofessional registered occupation programs comply with labor standards, are registered, and allow for a smooth transition into full teacher apprenticeship programs. The Department of Education, in partnership with the Department of Labor, must apply for funding through the following sources: (1) State Apprenticeship Expansion Formula (SAEF) Grants, both formula and competitive funding, for the 2025-2026 school year, if eligible. (2) Any other state or federal funding that is available to the Educator Apprenticeship Program. SYNOPSIS Currently, the Delaware Educator Apprenticeship Progam offers teacher apprenticeships to aspiring educators in Delaware. This Act expands the Delaware Educator Apprenticeship Program to include paraprofessional apprenticeships (paraprofessional registered occupation programs) and registered youth apprenticeship programs that begin in high school. Under this Act, the DOE will work with the DOL to create at least 1 paraprofessional registered occupation pilot program for the 2025-2026 school year. To that end, the DOE, in partnership with the DOL, must apply for State Apprenticeship Expansion Formula Grants, both formula and competitive funding, for the 2025-2026 school year, along with any other available state or federal funding.